Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 35A.5, subsection 14, paragraph c, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: c. The number of hours of veteransâ services provided by each county commission of veteran affairs executive director or administrator during the previous calendar fiscal year. Sec. 2. Section 35B.6, subsection 1, paragraph c, subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended by striking the subparagraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the following: (1) (a) Upon the employment of an executive director or administrator, the executive director or administrator shall comply with all directives of the commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs regarding the completion of any training or certification required for the personâs position under applicable state and federal law. The executive director or administrator shall also obtain a personal identification verification card necessary to access the veterans benefits management system. An executive director or administrator shall be removed from office if, after one year of employment, the executive director or administrator has not done all of the following: (i) Obtained certification. (ii) Obtained a personal identification verification card. House File 250, p. 2 (iii) Completed training directed by the commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs. (b) Upon a request from a county commission of veteran affairs and based on extenuating circumstances, the commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs may extend the time frame for an executive director or administrator to obtain a personal identification verification card. (2) To complete continuing education federally required for the personâs position, an executive director or administrator shall receive training only from entities approved by the commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs. Failure of an executive director or administrator to maintain certification shall be cause for removal from office. The expenses of training the executive director or administrator shall be paid from the appropriation authorized in section 35B.14. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 250, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor